Nebraska, session 109, LB646.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 54-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-170 Sections 54-170 to 54-1,131 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Livestock Brand Act.
Sec. 2. Section 54-171, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-171 For purposes of the Livestock Brand Act, the definitions
found in sections 54-171.01 to 54-190 and section 3 of this act shall be
used.
Sec. 3. Brand committee means the Nebraska Brand Committee.
Sec. 4. Section 54-1,108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,108 (1)(a) All physical inspections for brands provided for in
the Livestock Brand Act or section 54-415 shall be from sunrise to
sundown or during such other hours and under such conditions as the
Nebraska Brand Committee determines. The brand committee shall assess a
fifty-dollar late notice surcharge if a request for a physical inspection
is made less than forty-eight hours prior to the date of inspection.
(b) A physical inspection shall be required when brands applied by
hot iron or freeze branding methods are the exclusive means of ownership
identification and in all other cases that do not qualify for electronic
inspection as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(c)(i) A (c) Beginning October 1, 2021, a physical inspection fee of
eighty-five cents per head until June 30, 2023, and beginning July 1,
2023, a fee established by the Nebraska Brand Committee, of not more than
one dollar and fifty ten cents per head shall be charged for all cattle
inspected in accordance with the Livestock Brand Act or section 54-415,
inspected within the brand inspection area or brand inspection service
area by court order, inspected at the request of any bank, credit agency,
or lending institution with a legal or financial interest in such cattle,
or inspected at the request of a neighboring livestock owner with missing
-2-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
cattle.
(ii) The inspection fee for court-ordered inspections shall be paid
from the proceeds of the sale of such cattle if ordered by the court or
by either party as the court directs.
(iii) For other inspections not described in subdivision (1)(c)(ii)
of this section, the person requesting the inspection of such cattle is
responsible for the inspection fee.
(iv) Brand inspections requested by either a purchaser or seller of
cattle located within the brand inspection service area shall be provided
upon the same terms and charges as brand inspections performed within the
brand inspection area.
(v) If estray cattle are identified as a result of the inspection,
such cattle shall be processed in the manner provided by section 54-415.
(d) A surcharge, as established by the brand committee, up to twenty
dollars, may be charged to cover travel expenses incurred by the brand
inspector per inspection location when performing brand inspections. The
surcharge shall be collected by the brand inspector and paid by the
person requesting the inspection or the person required by law to have
the inspection. The actual mileage incurred by the inspector to perform a
physical inspection shall be paid by the party requesting inspection and
paid at the rate established by the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to section 81-1176.
(e) For physical inspections performed outside of the brand
inspection area that are not provided for in subdivision (c) of this
subsection, the fee shall be the inspection fee established in such
subdivision plus a fee to cover the actual expense of performing the
inspection, including mileage at the rate established by the Department
of Administrative Services and an hourly rate, not to exceed thirty
dollars per hour, for the travel and inspection time incurred by the
brand committee to perform such inspection. The brand committee shall
charge and collect the actual expense fee. Such fee shall apply to
-3-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
inspections performed outside the brand inspection area as part of an
investigation into known or alleged violations of the Livestock Brand Act
and shall be charged against the person committing the violation.
(2)(a) The brand committee may provide for electronic inspection of
enrolled cattle identified by approved nonvisual identifiers pursuant to
subsection (5) of section 54-199. The brand committee shall establish
procedures for enrollment of such cattle with the brand committee which
shall include providing acceptable certification or evidence of
ownership. Electronic inspection shall not require agency employees to be
present, except that random audits shall occur.
(b) A Beginning October 1, 2021, an electronic inspection fee not to
exceed eighty-five cents per head until June 30, 2023, and beginning July
1, 2023, a fee established by the brand committee of not more than one
dollar and fifty ten cents per head shall be charged for all cattle
subjected to electronic inspection in accordance with the Livestock Brand
Act or section 54-415.
(c) A certified bill of sale for sale of calves shall be provided to
qualified dairies once the required information is electronically
transferred to the brand committee on calves under thirty days of age.
The fee shall be the same as for an electronic inspection under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section.
(d) A certified transportation permit shall be provided to qualified
dairies after the required information is electronically transferred to
the brand committee on calves under thirty days of age which are moved
out of the inspection area. The fee shall be the same as for an
electronic inspection under subdivision (2)(b) of this section.
(e) On or before December 1, 2021, the brand committee shall report
to the Legislature any actions taken or necessary for implementing
electronic inspection authorized by this subsection, including personnel
and other resources utilized to support electronic inspection, how the
brand committee's information technology capabilities are utilized to
-4-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
support electronic inspection, a listing of approved nonvisual
identifiers, the requirements for enrolling cattle identified by approved
nonvisual identifiers, current and anticipated utilization of electronic
inspection by the livestock industry, and the fees required to recover
costs of performing electronic inspection.
(3) Any person who has reason to believe that cattle were shipped
erroneously due to an inspection error during a brand inspection may
request a reinspection. The person making such request shall be
responsible for the expenses incurred as a result of the reinspection
unless the results of the reinspection substantiate the claim of
inspection error, in which case the brand committee shall be responsible
for the reinspection expenses.
Sec. 5. Section 54-1,111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,111 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
no person shall sell or trade any cattle located within the brand
inspection area, nor shall any person buy or purchase any such cattle
unless the cattle have been inspected for evidence of ownership and a
certificate of inspection or brand clearance has been issued by the
Nebraska Brand Committee. Any person selling such cattle shall present to
the brand inspector a properly executed bill of sale, brand clearance, or
other satisfactory evidence of ownership which shall be filed with the
original certificate of inspection in the records of the brand committee.
Any time a brand inspection is required by law, a brand investigator or
brand inspector may transfer evidence of ownership of such cattle from a
seller to a purchaser by issuing a certificate of inspection.
(2) A brand inspection is not required:
(a) For cattle of a registered feedlot that are registered under
sections 54-1,120 to 54-1,122 shipped for direct slaughter or sale on any
terminal market;
(b) For cattle that are:
-5-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
(i) Transferred to a family corporation when all the shares of
capital stock of the corporation are owned by the husband, wife,
children, or grandchildren of the transferor and there is no
consideration for the transfer other than the issuance of stock of the
corporation to such family members; or
(ii) Transferred to a limited liability company in which membership
is limited to the husband, wife, children, or grandchildren of the
transferor and there is no consideration paid for the transfer other than
a membership interest in the limited liability company;
(c) When the change of ownership of cattle is a change in form only
and the surviving interests are in the exact proportion as the original
interests of ownership. When there is a change of ownership described in
subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of this section, an affidavit, on a form
prescribed by the Nebraska Brand Committee, signed by the transferor and
stating the nature of the transfer and the number of cattle involved and
the brands presently on the cattle, shall be filed with the brand
committee;
(d) For cattle sold or purchased for educational or exhibition
purposes or other recognized youth activities if a properly executed bill
of sale is exchanged and presented upon demand. Educational or exhibition
purpose means cattle sold or purchased for the purpose of being fed,
bred, managed, or tended in a program designed to demonstrate or instruct
in the use of various feed rations, the selection of individuals of
certain physical conformation or breeds, the measurement and recording of
rate of gain in weight or fat content of meat or milk produced, or the
preparation of cattle for the purpose of exhibition or for judging as to
quality and conformation;
(e) For calves under the age of thirty days sold or purchased at
private treaty if a bill of sale is exchanged and presented upon demand;
and
(f) For seedstock cattle raised by the seller and individually
-6-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
registered with an organized breed association if a properly executed
bill of sale is exchanged and presented upon demand; and .
(g) For cattle shipped to or from a qualified dairy.
(3) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer
shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to
offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall
not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations
shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.
Sec. 6. Section 54-1,120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-1,120 (1)(a) (1) Any person who operates a cattle feeding
operation located within the brand inspection area may apply make
application to the brand committee Nebraska Brand Committee for
registration as a registered feedlot. The application form shall be
prescribed by the brand committee and shall be made available by the
executive director of the brand committee for this purpose upon written
request. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include
the applicant's social security number. After the brand committee has
received a properly completed application, an agent of the brand
committee shall within thirty days make an investigation to determine if
the following requirements are satisfied:
(i) (a) The operator's feedlot shall must be permanently fenced; and
(ii) (b) The operator shall must commonly practice feeding cattle to
finish for slaughter.
(b) If the application is satisfactory, and upon payment of an
initial registration fee by the applicant, the brand committee shall
issue a registration number and registration certificate valid for one
year unless rescinded for cause. If the registration is rescinded for
cause, any registration fee shall be forfeited by the applicant.
(c)(i) The initial registration fee and the annual renewal
registration fee for a registered feedlot shall be an amount that is
-7-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
fifty cents multiplied by the maximum livestock capacity of the
registered feedlot. for a registered feedlot having one thousand head or
less capacity and an equal amount for each additional one thousand head
capacity, or part thereof, of such registered feedlot. For each
subsequent year, the renewal fee for a registered feedlot shall be an
amount for the first one thousand head or portion thereof of average
annual inventory of cattle on feed of the registered feedlot and an equal
amount for each additional one thousand head or portion thereof of
average annual inventory of cattle on feed of the registered feedlot. The
brand committee shall set the fee per one thousand head capacity or
average annual inventory so as to correspond with the inspection fee
provided under section 54-1,108.
(ii) The annual renewal registration fee shall be paid on an annual
basis.
(2) The brand committee may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for the operation of registered feedlots to assure that brand
laws are complied with, that registered feedlot shipping certificates are
available, and that proper records are maintained. Violation of sections
54-1,120 to 54-1,122 subjects the operator to revocation or suspension of
the feedlot registration issued. Sections 54-1,120 to 54-1,122 shall not
be construed as prohibiting the operation of nonregistered feedlots.
(3) Registered feedlots are subject to inspection at any reasonable
time at the discretion of the brand committee and its authorized agents,
and the operator shall show cattle purchase records or certificates of
inspection to cover all cattle in his or her feedlot. Cattle having
originated from such registered feedlots may from time to time, at the
discretion of the committee, be subject to a spot-check inspection and
audit at destination to enable the brand committee to assure satisfactory
compliance with the brand laws by the registered feedlot operator.
(4) The operator of a registered feedlot shall keep cattle inventory
records. A form for such purpose shall be prescribed by the brand
-8-

LB646 LB646
2025 2025
committee. The brand committee and its employees may from time to time
make spot checks and audits of the registered feedlots and the records of
cattle on feed in such feedlots.
(5) The brand committee may rescind the registration of any
registered feedlot operator who fails to cooperate or violates the laws
or rules and regulations of the brand committee relating to covering
registered feedlots.
Sec. 7. Original sections 54-170, 54-171, 54-1,108, 54-1,111, and
54-1,120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-9-